apertium-es-gl.es.dix
<pardef n="s/entar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>entaríamos</l><r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaría</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaríais</l> <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entarías</l>  <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entarían</l>  <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaría</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaremos</l> <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaré</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaréis</l>  <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entarás</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entarán</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entará</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entando</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entándo</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabiéndo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entamos</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enté</l>      <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entasteis</l> <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaste</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaron</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entó</l>      <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entad</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enta</l>      <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><p><l>os</l><r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entad</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabed"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entá</l>      <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabé"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entád</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabéd"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ienta</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iénta</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entar</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entar</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__saber"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entár</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabér"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entábamos</l> <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaba</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entabais</l>  <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entabas</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaban</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaba</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entáramos</l> <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entara</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entarais</l>  <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaras</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entaran</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entara</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entadas</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entada</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entados</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entado</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entamos</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iento</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entáis</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ientas</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ientan</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ienta</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entemos</l>   <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iente</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>entéis</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ientes</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ienten</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iente</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iénten</l>    <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iénte</l>     <r>entar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
</pardef>

<e r="RL" lm="sentar"><i>s</i><par n="s/entar__vblex"/></e>
